Utah statutes.
53-5b-103.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Firearm" means a device from which is expelled a projectile by action of an explosive.

(2)  "Firearm accessory" means an item that is used in conjunction with or mounted upon a firearm, firearm action, or firearm receiver but is not essential to the basic function of a firearm, including:

(a)  a telescopic or laser sight;

(b)  a magazine;

(c)  a flash or sound suppressor;

(d)  a folding or aftermarket stock or grip;

(e)  a speed-loader;

(f)  an ammunition carrier; and

(g)  a light for target illumination.

(3)  "Generic and insignificant parts:"

(a)  means parts that have other manufacturing or consumer product applications; and

(b)  includes:

(i)  springs;

(ii)  screws;

(iii)  nuts; and

(iv)  pins.

(4)  "Manufactured" means creating a firearm, a firearm action or receiver, a firearm accessory, or ammunition from basic materials for functional usefulness, including:

(a)  forging;

(b)  casting;

(c)  machining; and

(d)  another process for working materials.



Enacted by Chapter 5, 2010 General Session

